Illinois, session 104th, SB2217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by adding Article 524.5 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/Art. 24.5 heading new)7ARTICLE 24.5. DISSOLUTION OF TOWNSHIPS WITH A POPULATION LESS 8THAN 5000 9    (60 ILCS 1/24.5-5 new)10    Sec. 24.5-5. Dissolving townships with a population of 11less than 500. All townships with a population less than 5000 12are dissolved and must either consolidate with an adjacent 13township or the county containing the geographic boundaries of 14the dissolving township.